Vermont, session 2025-2026, H603.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
* * *
(d) U.S. military disability retirement income, U.S. military retirement
income, and U.S. military survivor benefit income. All military disability
retirement income provided in accordance with 10 U.S.C. chapter 61 shall be
excluded from taxable income under subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this
chapter. For taxpayers of any filing status, other U.S. military retirement
income, and U.S. military survivor benefit income received by an eligible
VT LEG #386322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.603
2026 Page 2 of 3
beneficiary, received by a taxpayer of this State shall be excluded from taxable
income under subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter as follows:
(1) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $125,000.00, all federally taxable U.S. military retirement income and
survivor benefit income shall be excluded.
(2) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$125,000.00 but less than $175,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
U.S. military retirement income and survivor benefit income to be excluded
shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross
income over $125,000.00, determined by:
(A) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $175,000.00;
(B) dividing the value under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2)
by $50,000.00; and
(C) multiplying the value under subdivision (B) of this subdivision
(2) by the federally taxable U.S. military retirement income and survivor
benefit income received.
(3) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $175,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable U.S. military
retirement income and survivor benefit income received shall be excluded
under this section.
VT LEG #386322 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.603
2026 Page 3 of 3
(e)(1) Requirement to elect one exclusion. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for more than one of the exclusions under
subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section shall elect only one of the
exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible.
(2) A taxpayer of this State who is eligible during the taxable year for
the military retirement and survivor benefit exclusion under subsection (d) of
this section may elect that exclusion regardless of whether the taxpayer also
elects an exclusion under subsections (a)–(c) of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this section and Sec. 1 (military disability
retirement income) shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2026, and shall
apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386322 v.1